Utah statutes.
67-18-2.   Definitions.
As used in this act:
(1)  "Employer" means the state and its political subdivisions.
(2)  "Employee" means any person employed by the employer.
(3)  "Representative" means any person designated in writing by an employee to
represent such employee in a grievance or other employment matter.
